Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1957YC (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. ANTI-OBESITY MEDICATION REVIEW AND REPORT. For 1 purposes of the medical assistance program under chapter 2 249A, the department of health and human services shall 3 review anti-obesity medications for effectiveness, the impact 4 on comorbidities, the potential for cost savings due to 5 deferred medical procedures and reduced medications related 6 to comorbidity, recommended eligibility requirements, and any 7 other criteria the department deems relevant. The department 8 shall submit a report to the general assembly by December 1, 9 2025, with the departmentâs findings and proposed eligibility 10 requirements. 11